Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.100

Certification—Application form—Fee.

Applications for certification must be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the determination of whether the applicant meets the requirements for certification provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 71; 1991 c 3 s 211; 1987 c 412 s 11.]